West Virginia, session 2025, HB2440.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. PRIMARY ELECTIONS AND NOMINATING PROCEDURES. §3-5-1. Time and place of holding primary elections in the year one thousand nine hundred eighty and thereafter; hours polls open; time of holding primary election for the Office of President of the United States. Primary elections shall be held at the voting place in each of the voting precincts in the state, for the purposes set forth in this article, on the second Tuesday in May 1986 and in each second year thereafter.At such election the polls shall be opened and closed at the hours provided for opening and closing the polls in a general election.Primary elections for the Office of President of the United States shall be held on the third Tuesday in February in 2028 and in each fourth year thereafter.